Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202021-243
Liability of shareholders.

(MBCA 6.22) (a) A purchaser
from a corporation of its own shares is not liable to the corporation or its
creditors with respect to the shares except to pay the consideration for which
the shares were authorized to be issued under section 21-242 or specified
in the subscription agreement under section 21-241.

(b) Unless otherwise provided
in the articles of incorporation, a shareholder of a corporation is not personally
liable for the acts or debts of the corporation, except that he or she may
become personally liable by reason of his or her own acts or conduct.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 43.